Arkansas, session 2025, HB1922.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-4-2706(b), concerning investment tax
incentives under the Consolidated Incentive Act of 2003, is amended to read
as follows:
(b)(1)(A) The award of incentives under this section are at the
discretion of the Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission.
(B) The director may offer a tax credit of up to ten
percent (10%) under this subsection.
(2) If offered, an application for an income tax credit or a
sales and use tax credit under this section shall be submitted to the
Arkansas Economic Development Commission.
(3) Eligibility for incentives under this subsection and
subsections (c)–(e) of this section is dependent upon the tier in which the
*JLL323*
03/28/2025 1:38:23 PM JLL323

HB1922
project is located, as follows:
(A) For tier 1 counties, the business shall invest five
million dollars ($5,000,000) or more and have an annual payroll for new full-
time permanent employees in excess of two million dollars ($2,000,000);
(B) For tier 2 counties, the business shall invest three
million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($3,750,000) or more and have an
annual payroll for new full-time permanent employees in excess of one million
five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000);
(C) For tier 3 counties, the business shall invest three
million dollars ($3,000,000) or more and have an annual payroll for new full-
time permanent employees in excess of one million two hundred thousand
dollars ($1,200,000); and
(D) For tier 4 counties, the business shall invest two
million dollars ($2,000,000) or more and have an annual payroll for new full-
time permanent employees in excess of eight hundred thousand dollars
($800,000).
(4)(A) An approved financial incentive agreement shall be
transmitted to the qualified business and the Department of Finance and
Administration.
(B) Before the commission approves a financial incentive
agreement under this subsection, the qualified business shall elect to
receive the tax credits allowed under this subsection as:
(i) Sales and use tax credits; or
(ii) Income tax credits.
(5) A qualified business shall reach the investment threshold
within four (4) years from the date of the approved financial incentive
agreement, except for lease payments authorized by subdivision (b)(6)(D) of
this section or subdivision (c)(6) of this section.
(6)(A)(i) After receiving an approved financial incentive
agreement from the commission, a qualified business shall certify to the
department the eligible project costs annually at the end of each calendar
year for the term of the financial incentive agreement.
(ii) The department shall authorize an income tax
credit or a sales and use tax credit of up to ten percent (10%) of total
audited eligible project costs.
(B) The amount of the income tax credit or sales and use
03/28/2025 1:38:23 PM JLL323

HB1922
tax credit authorized under subdivision (a)(6)(A)(ii) (b)(6)(A)(ii) of this
section may offset up to fifty percent (50%) of a qualified business's income
tax or sales and use tax liability annually.
(C) Unused tax credits under this subdivision (b)(6) may
be carried forward for up to nine (9) years after the year in which the
credit was first earned or until the tax credits are exhausted, whichever
occurs first.
(D) A qualified business that enters into a lease for a
building or equipment for a period of at least five (5) years may count the
lease payments for the first five (5) years as a qualifying expenditure for
the investment threshold required for this investment incentive.
(7) Technology-based enterprises, as defined by § 14-164-203,
may earn, at the discretion of the director, an income tax credit or sales
and use tax credit based on new investment, provided that the technology-
based enterprise:
(A) Creates a new payroll of at least two hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($250,000); and
(B) Pays an average hourly wage that is at least one
hundred fifty percent (150%) of the lesser of the state or county average
hourly wage for the county in which the business locates or expands.
(8)(A) The income tax credit or sales and use tax credit that
may be earned by a technology-based enterprise is based on the amount of
investment as follows:
(i) The income tax credit or sales and use tax
credit is equal to two percent (2%) of the investment for an investment that
is between two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) and five hundred
thousand dollars ($500,000);
(ii) The income tax credit or sales and use tax
credit is equal to four percent (4%) of the investment for that part of the
investment that is over five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) and less
than one million dollars ($1,000,000);
(iii) The income tax credit or sales and use tax
credit is equal to six percent (6%) of the investment for that part of the
investment that is over one million dollars ($1,000,000) and less than two
million dollars ($2,000,000); and
(iv) The income tax credit or sales and use tax
03/28/2025 1:38:23 PM JLL323

HB1922
credit is equal to eight percent (8%) of the investment for that part of the
investment that is over two million dollars ($2,000,000).
(B) The amount of credit earned is determined based upon
the amount invested, as verified by an audit by the department.
(9) All investments by a technology-based enterprise shall be
made within four (4) years of the date of the approved financial incentive
agreement.
(10) Prior to commission approval of a financial incentive
agreement, the business shall elect to receive the tax credits as either:
(A) A sales and use tax credit; or
(B) An income tax credit.
(11) The income tax credit or sales and use tax credit earned by
a technology-based enterprise may offset income tax liabilities or sales and
use tax liabilities as follows:
(A) A technology-based enterprise that pays at least one
hundred fifty percent (150%) of the lesser of the state or county average
hourly wage for the county in which the business locates or expands may
offset up to fifty percent (50%) of its income tax liability or sales and use
tax liability annually;
(B) A technology-based enterprise that pays at least one
hundred seventy-five percent (175%) of the lesser of the state or county
average hourly wage for the county in which the business locates or expands
may offset up to seventy-five percent (75%) of its income tax liability or
sales and use tax liability annually; and
(C) A technology-based enterprise that pays at least two
hundred percent (200%) of the lesser of the state or county average hourly
wage for the county in which the business locates or expands may offset up to
one hundred percent (100%) of its income tax liability or sales and use tax
liability annually.
(12) After receiving an approved financial incentive agreement
from the commission, a qualified business shall certify to the department the
eligible project costs and average hourly wages annually at the end of each
tax year for the term of the financial incentive agreement.
(13) Unused income tax credits or sales and use tax credits may
be carried forward for up to nine (9) years after the year in which the
credit was first earned or until the tax credits are exhausted, whichever
03/28/2025 1:38:23 PM JLL323

HB1922
occurs first.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 15-4-2706, concerning investment tax
incentives under the Consolidated Incentive Act of 2003, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(f)(1) The director may award an eligible business with a corporate
headquarters relocating to this state an income tax credit of up to fifty
percent (50%) of the payroll for the new full-time permanent employees of a
corporate headquarters relocating to this state.
(2) An eligible business shall receive a positive cost-benefit
analysis from the commission for the corporate headquarters relocating to
this state before being offered a financial incentive agreement under this
subsection.
(3) Eligibility for incentives under this subsection is
dependent upon the tier of the county in which the corporate headquarters is
relocating, as follows:
(A) For tier 1 counties, the eligible business shall
create at least three hundred (300) new full-time permanent employees with an
average hourly wage that exceeds the lesser of one hundred fifty percent
(150%) of the county or state average hourly wage for the county to which the
corporate headquarters is relocating;
(B) For tier 2 counties, the eligible business shall
create at least two hundred fifty (250) new full-time permanent employees
with an average hourly wage that exceeds the lesser of one hundred twenty-
five percent (125%) of the county or state average hourly wage for the county
to which the corporate headquarters is relocating;
(C) For tier 3 counties, the eligible business shall
create at least two hundred (200) new full-time permanent employees with an
average hourly wage that exceeds the lesser of one hundred fifteen percent
(115%) of the county or state average hourly wage for the county to which the
corporate headquarters is relocating; and
(D) For tier 4 counties, the eligible business shall
create at least one hundred fifty (150) new full-time permanent employees
with an average hourly wage that exceeds the lesser of one hundred ten
percent (110%) of the county or state average hourly wage for the county to
which the corporate headquarters is relocating.
03/28/2025 1:38:23 PM JLL323

HB1922
(4)(A) At the end of the calendar year in which a qualified
business executes an approved financial incentive agreement under this
subsection and at the end of each subsequent calendar year for the term of
the financial incentive agreement, the qualified business shall certify, on a
form provided by the department, the requisite payroll and number of new
full-time permanent employees related to the relocated corporate headquarters
during the preceding calendar year.
(B)(i) Upon receipt of the certification form required
under subdivision (f)(4)(A) of this section, the Revenue Division of the
Department of Finance and Administration shall audit and verify the
certification form.
(ii) After the audit and verification required under
subdivision (f)(4)(B)(i) of this section, the department shall determine the
amount of the income tax credit earned by the qualified business for the
preceding calendar year and issue an income tax credit to the qualified
business to be applied against the qualified business’s income tax liability.
(5) The amount of the income tax credit allowed under this
subsection that may offset a qualified business’s income tax liability is as
follows:
(A) For the first five years (5) from the year following
the date of the execution of the financial incentive agreement, up to one
hundred percent (100%) of the qualified business's income tax liability
resulting from the relocation of the corporate headquarters may be offset by
the income tax credit allowed under this subsection;
(B) For the sixth year from the year following the date of
the execution of the financial incentive agreement, up to eighty percent
(80%) of the qualified business’s income tax liability resulting from the
relocation of the corporate headquarters may be offset by the income tax
credit allowed under this subsection;
(C) For the seventh year from the year following the date
of the execution of the financial incentive agreement, up to sixty percent
(60%) of the qualified business’s income tax liability resulting from the
relocation of the corporate headquarters may be offset by the income tax
credit allowed under this subsection;
(D) For the eighth year from the year following the date
of the execution of the financial incentive agreement, up to forty percent
03/28/2025 1:38:23 PM JLL323

HB1922
(40%) of the qualified business’s income tax liability resulting from the
relocation of the corporate headquarters may be offset by the income tax
credit allowed under this subsection;
(E) For the ninth year from the year following the date of
the execution of the financial incentive agreement, up to twenty percent
(20%) of the qualified business’s income tax liability resulting from the
relocation of the corporate headquarters may be offset by the income tax
credit allowed under this subsection; and
(F) For the tenth and subsequent years following the date
of the execution of the financial incentive agreement, the qualified
business’s income tax liability resulting from the relocation of the
corporate headquarters shall not be offset by the income tax credit allowed
under this subsection.
(6) Unused income tax credits authorized under this subsection
shall not carry forward to subsequent tax years.
(7) The income tax credits allowed under this subsection shall
not be sold or transferred.
(8) The employment and payroll requirements provided for in this
subsection shall be met within four (4) years of the date of the approved
financial incentive agreement for the qualified business.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 15-4-2711(g)(1), concerning the
administration of the Consolidated Incentive Act of 2003, is amended to read
as follows:
(g)(1) If Except as provided in § 15-4-2706(f)(8), if the annual
payroll of the business applying for incentives under this subchapter is not
met within two (2) years after signing the financial incentive agreement, the
business may request in writing an extension of time to reach the required
payroll threshold.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 15-4-2711, concerning administration of the
Consolidated Incentive Act of 2003, is amended to add additional subsections
to read as follows:
(s) Failure to annually certify or recertify payroll figures and claim
the earned tax credits outlined in § 15-4-2706(b) and § 15-4-2706(f) shall
result in:
03/28/2025 1:38:23 PM JLL323

HB1922
(1) A ten-percent reduction of the earned tax credit if not
claimed within twelve (12) months of the end of the tax year in which the tax
credit was earned;
(2) A one-hundred-percent forfeiture of the earned tax credit if
not claimed within twenty-four (24) months of the end of the tax year in
which the tax credit was earned; or
(3) Termination of the financial incentive agreement if an
initial certification of payroll figures has not been filed with the
department within four (4) years after the date of the approved financial
incentive agreement, unless the date has been extended by the director.
(t)(1) If the annual payroll of a qualified business receiving
incentives under § 15-4-2706(b) or § 15-4-2706(f) falls below the payroll
threshold to be eligible for the incentive in a year subsequent to the year
in which the qualified business initially qualified for the incentive, the
incentives outlined in the financial incentive agreement for the qualified
business shall be terminated unless:
(A) The qualified business files with the Arkansas
Economic Development Commission a written application for an extension of the
incentives explaining why the qualified business's payroll has fallen below
the level required to be eligible for the incentive; and
(B) The written application filed by the qualified
business under subdivision (t)(1)(A) of this section is approved by the
Arkansas Economic Development Commission.
(2) The director and the secretary may:
(A) Approve an application for an extension of time that
was filed under subdivision (t)(1) of this section for a period not to exceed
two (2) years for a qualified business to bring the payroll of the qualified
business back up to the requisite threshold amount; and
(B) Approve the continuation of incentives during the
period of the extension granted under subdivision (t)(2)(A) of this section.
(3)(A) If a qualified business fails to reach the requisite
payroll threshold before the expiration of the period of the extension
granted under subdivision (t)(2)(A) of this section, the qualified business
is liable for the repayment of all incentives previously received by the
qualified business that were conditioned on the approved financial incentive
agreement for which the payroll threshold has not been met.
03/28/2025 1:38:23 PM JLL323

HB1922
(B) If a qualified business fails to reach the payroll
threshold required under an approved financial incentive agreement, the
department has two (2) years to collect incentives previously received by the
qualified business or file a lawsuit to enforce the repayment provisions.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 15-4-2712(b)(2), concerning restrictions on
the combination of certain incentives authorized under the Consolidated
Incentive Act of 2003, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The following incentives for targeted businesses may be
combined with each other for the same project as long as multiple incentives
are not claimed for the same expenditures but shall not be combined with any
other incentives authorized in this subchapter during the period in which the
qualified business receives incentives under this subchapter:
(A) The investment tax credit authorized under § 15-4-
2706(b)(7) may be combined with:
(i) The research and development income tax credits
authorized under § 15-4-2708(b); and
(ii) Either the:
(a) Payroll rebate program authorized under §
15-4-2707(e); or
(b) Payroll tax credit program authorized
under § 15-4-2709;
(B) The sales and use tax refund authorized under § 15-4-
2706(e) may be combined with:
(i) The research and development income tax credits
authorized under § 15-4-2708(b); and
(ii) Either the:
(a) Payroll rebate program authorized under §
15-4-2707(e); or
(b) Payroll tax credit program authorized
under § 15-4-2709;
(C)(B) The payroll rebate program authorized under § 15-4-
2707(e) may be combined with:
(i) The research and development income tax credits
authorized under § 15-4-2708(b); and
(ii) Either the:
03/28/2025 1:38:23 PM JLL323

HB1922
(a) Investment tax credit program authorized
under § 15-4-2706(b)(7); or
(b) Sales The sales and use tax refund program
authorized under § 15-4-2706(e);
(D)(C) The payroll income tax credit authorized under §
15-4-2709 may be combined with:
(i) The research and development income tax credits
authorized under § 15-4-2708(b); and
(ii) Either the:
(a) Investment tax credit authorized under §
15-4-2706(b)(7); or
(b) Sales The sales and use tax refund program
authorized under § 15-4-2706(e); and
(E)(D) The research and development income tax credits
authorized under § 15-4-2708(b) may be combined with:
(i) Either the:
(a) Payroll rebate program authorized under §
15-4-2707(e); or
(b) Payroll tax credit program authorized
under § 15-4-2709; and
(ii) Either the:
(a) Investment tax credit program authorized
under § 15-4-2706(b)(7); or
(b) Sales The sales and use tax refund program
authorized under § 15-4-2706(e).

SECTION 6. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1–5 of this act are effective for
tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.








03/28/2025 1:38:23 PM JLL323